Indiana, session 2026, HB1298.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-30-5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 85, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A person who operates a vehicle with an
alcohol concentration equivalent to at least eight-hundredths (0.08)
gram of alcohol but less than fifteen-hundredths (0.15) gram of alcohol
per:
(1) one hundred (100) milliliters of the person's blood; or
(2) two hundred ten (210) liters of the person's breath;
commits a Class C misdemeanor.
(b) A person who operates a vehicle with an alcohol concentration
equivalent to at least fifteen-hundredths (0.15) gram of alcohol per:
(1) one hundred (100) milliliters of the person's blood; or
(2) two hundred ten (210) liters of the person's breath;
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) A person who operates a vehicle with a controlled substance
listed in schedule I or II of IC 35-48-2 or its metabolite in the person's
blood commits a Class C misdemeanor.
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


(d) It is a defense to subsection (c) that
(1) the accused person consumed the controlled substance in
accordance with a valid prescription or order of a practitioner (as
defined in IC 35-48-1.1) who acted in the course of the
practitioner's professional practice. or
(2) the:
(A) controlled substance is marijuana or a metabolite of
marijuana;
(B) person was not intoxicated;
(C) person did not cause a traffic accident; and
(D) substance was identified by means of a chemical test taken
pursuant to IC 9-30-7.
SECTION 2. IC 35-48-2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 250, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The controlled substances
listed in this section are included in schedule I.
(b) Opiates. Any of the following opiates, including their isomers,
esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, unless
specifically excepted by rule of the board or unless listed in another
schedule, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and
salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:
4-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl.
Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-
piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide) (9815).
Acetyl fentanyl (Other names include:
N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide).
Acetylmethadol (9601).
Acrylfentanyl. Other name: N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-
N-phenylacrylamide.
Allylprodine (9602).
Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-
thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide) (9832).
Alphacetylmethadol (9603).
Alphameprodine (9604).
Alphamethadol (9605).
Alpha'-Methyl butyryl fentanyl (2-methyl-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin- 4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide) (9864).
Alphamethylfentanyl (9814).
Benzethidine (9606).
Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (9831). Other name:
N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl
]-N-phenylpropanamide.
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-
phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide) (9830).
Betacetylmethadol (9607).
Betameprodine (9608).
Betamethadol (9609).
Betaprodine (9611).
B r o r p h i n e ( 9 0 9 8 ) . O t h e r n a m e :
1-(1-(1-(4-bromophenyl)ethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-1,3-dihydro-2
H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-one.
2-(2-(4-butoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1yl)-N,N-dieth
ylethan-1-amine (butonitazene); other name: butoxynitazene
(9751).
Clonitazene (9612).
Cyclopentyl fentanyl. Other name:
N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxami
de.
Dextromoramide (9613).
Diampromide (9615).
Diethylthiambutene (9616).
N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-flourobenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-y
l)ethan-1-amine (flunitazene) (9756).
N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)eth
an-1-amine (metodesnitazene) (9764).
N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-
1-yl)ethan-1-amine (metonitazene).
N,N-diethyl-2-(5-nitro-2-(4-propoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-
1-yl)ethan-1-amine (protonitazene); other name: pronitazene.
Difenoxin (9168).
Dimenoxadol (9617).
Dimepheptanol (9618).
2',5'-Dimethoxyfentanyl (N-(1- (2,5-dimethoxyphenethyl)
piperidin-4-yl)- N-phenylpropionamide) (9861).
Dimethylthiambutene (9619).
Dioxaphetyl butyrate (9621).
Dipipanone (9622).
2-(2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1yl)-N,N-diethylethan-
1-amine (etodesnitazene; etazene).
2-(4-ethnoxybenzyl)5-nitro-1(2-(pyrorolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-ben
zimidazol (N-pyrrolidino etonizatene; etonitazepyne).
Ethylmethylthiambutene (9623).
Etonitazene (9624).
Etoxeridine (9625).
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


Fentanyl related substances.
Furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin- 4-yl)- N-phenylfuran-
2-carboxamide) (9834).
3-Furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin- 4-yl)-
N-phenylfuran- 3- carboxamide) (9860).
Furethidine (9626).
Hydroxypethidine (9627).
Is o b u t yr yl f e n t a n yl . O t h e r n a me :
N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide.
Isotonitazene. Other name: N,N-diethyl-2-
(2-(4 isopropoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-
1-yl)ethan-1-amine).
Isovaleryl fentanyl (3-methyl- N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)- N-
phenylbutanamide) (9862).
Ketobemidone (9628).
Levomoramide (9629).
Levophenacylmorphan (9631).
Meta-Fluorofentanyl (N-(3- fluorophenyl)- N-
(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) propionamide) (9857).
Meta-Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(3-fluorophenyl)- N-
(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) isobutyramide) (9858).
Methoxyacetyl fentanyl. Other name:
2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide.
2-Methyl AP-237
(1-(2-methyl-4-(3-phenylprop-2-en-1-yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1
-one) (9664).
3-Methylfentanyl [N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-
piperidyl]-N-phenyl-propanimide](9813).
3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-
piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide) (9833).
M e t o n i t a z e n e
(N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol
-1-yl)ethan-1-amine) (9757).
MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine) (9961).
Morpheridine (9632).
N-[1-benzyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (benzylfentanyl),
including any isomers, salts, or salts of isomers (9818).
N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl)ethyl] 25 piperidin-4-yl]-
N-phenylpropionamide, also known as N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-
(2-thienyl)ethyl] -4- piperidinyl]- N-phenylpropanamide,
(beta-hydroxythiofentanyl).
N-(4-chlorophenyl)- N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) isobutyramide
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


(para-chloroisobutyryl fentanyl).
N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)
acetamide (ocfentanil).
N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4 -yl) butyramide
(para-fluorobutyryl fentanyl).
N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutyramide, also known
as N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide, (butyryl
fentanyl).
N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpentanamide (valeryl
fentanyl).
N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin -4-yl) butyramide
(para-methoxybutyryl fentanyl).
N-[1-(2-thienyl)methyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide
(thenylfentanyl), including any isomers, salts, or salts of isomers
(9834).
N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide (isobutyryl
fentanyl).
N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)- Nphenylcyclopentanecarboxamide
(cyclopentyl fentanyl).
Noracymethadol (9633).
Norlevorphanol (9634).
Normethadone (9635).
Norpipanone (9636).
O c f e n t a n i l . O t h e r n a m e :
N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)
acetamide.
Ortho-fluorofentanyl or 2-fluorofentanyl. Other name:
N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide.
Ortho-Fluorofuranyl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)- N-
(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide) (9863).
Para-chloroisobutyryl fentanyl. Other name:
N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide.
Para-fluorobutyryl fentanyl. Other name:
N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide.
Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-
[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide (9812).
Para-methoxybutyryl fentanyl. Other name:
N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide.
Para-Methoxyfuranyl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)- N-
(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) furan-2-carboxamide (9859).
Para-Methylcyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(4-methylphenyl)- N-
(1-phenethylpiperidin- 4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide) (9865).
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


Phenadoxone (9637).
Phenampromide (9638).
Phenomorphan (9647).
Phenoperidine (9641).
PEPAP [1-(2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine] (9663).
Piritramide (9642).
Proheptazine (9643).
Properidine (9644).
Propiram (9649).
Racemoramide (9645).
Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl. Other name:
N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carb
oxamide.
Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[ 1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-
piperidinyl]-propanamide) (9835).
Tianeptine (7-[(3-chloro-6-methyl-5,5-dioxo-11H-benzo[c]
[2,1]benzothiazepin-11-yl)amino]heptanoic acid).
Tilidine (9750).
Trimeperidine (9646).
U47700 (3,4-dichloro- N- [2-dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-
N-methyl- benzamide).
V a l e r y l f e n t a n y l . O t h e r n a m e :
N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpentanamide.
Zipeprol (1-methoxy-3- [4-(2-methoxy-2-phenylethyl) piperazin-
1-yl]- 1- phenylpropan- 2-ol) (9873).
(c) Opium derivatives. Any of the following opium derivatives, their
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted by rule
of the board or unless listed in another schedule, whenever the
existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within
the specific chemical designation:
Acetorphine (9319).
Acetyldihydrocodeine (9051).
Benzylmorphine (9052).
Codeine methylbromide (9070).
Codeine-N-Oxide (9053).
Cyprenorphine (9054).
Desomorphine (9055).
Dihydromorphine (9145).
Drotebanol (9335).
Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt) (9056).
Heroin (9200).
Hydromorphinol (9301).
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


Methyldesorphine (9302).
Methyldihydromorphine (9304).
Morphine methylbromide (9305).
Morphine methylsulfonate (9306).
Morphine-N-Oxide (9307).
Myrophine (9308).
Nicocodeine (9309).
Nicomorphine (9312).
Normorphine (9313).
Pholcodine (9314).
Thebacon (9315).
(d) Hallucinogenic substances. Unless specifically excepted or
unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or
preparation which contains any quantity of the following
hallucinogenic, psychedelic, or psychogenic substances, their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of these salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
designation (for purposes of this subsection only, the term "isomer"
includes the optical, position, and geometric isomers):
1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine (7473). Other name: TCPy.
4-Bromo-2, 5-Dimethoxyamphetamine (7391). Some trade or
other names: 4-Bromo-2, 5-Dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine;
4-Bromo-2, 5-DMA.
4-Bromo-2, 5-dimethoxyphenethylamine (7392). Some trade or
other names:
2-[4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]-1-aminoethane;
alpha-desmethyl DOB; 2C-B, Nexus.
2, 5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylamphet-amine (7399). Other name:
DOET.
2, 5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine (7348). Other
name: 2C-T-7.
2, 5-Dimethoxyamphetamine (7396). Some trade or other names:
2, 5-Dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 2, 5-DMA.
4-Methoxyamphetamine (7411). Some trade or other names:
4-Methoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; Paramethoxyamphetamine;
PMA.
5-Methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine (7401). Other
Name: MMDA.
5-Methoxy-N, N-diisopropyltryptamine, including any isomers,
salts, or salts of isomers (7439). Other name: 5-MeO-DIPT.
4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine (7395). Some trade and
other names: 4-methyl-2,
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; DOM; and STP.
3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine (7400). Other name: MDA.
3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (7404). Other names:
N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy) phenethylamine;
N-ethyl MDA; MDE; and MDEA.
3, 4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA) (7405).
3, 4, 5-trimethoxy amphetamine (7390). Other name: TMA.
Alpha-ethyltryptamine (7249). Some trade and other names:
Etryptamine; Monase; [alpha]-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine;
3-(2-aminobutyl) indole; [alpha]-ET; and AET.
Alpha-methyltryptamine (7432). Other name: AMT.
Bufotenine (7433). Some trade and other names:
3-(B-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole;
3-(2-dimethylaminonethyl)-5-indolol; N, N-dimethylserotonin;
5-hydroxy-N, N-dimethyltryptamine; mappine.
Diethyltryptamine (7434). Some trade or other names: N,
N-Diethyltryptamine; DET.
Dimethyltryptamine (7435). Some trade or other names: DMT.
Ibogaine (7260). Some trade and other names: 7-Ethyl-6, 6b, 7, 8,
9, 10, 12, 13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6, 9-methano-5H-pyrido (1',
2': 1, 2, azepino 4, 5-b) indole; tabernanthe iboga.
Lysergic acid diethylamide (7315). Other name: LSD.
Marijuana (7360).
Mescaline (7381).
Methoxetamine[2-(ethylamino)-2-(3-methoxyphenyl)
cyclohexan-1-one or 2-(3-methoxyphenyl)-2-(ethylamino)-
cyclohexanone].
Parahexyl (7374). Some trade or other names:
3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7, 8, 9, 10-Tetrahydro-6, 6,
9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo (b,d) pyran; Snyhexyl.
Peyote (7415), including:
(A) all parts of the plant that are classified botanically as
lophophora williamsii lemaire, whether growing or not;
(B) the seeds thereof;
(C) any extract from any part of the plant; and
(D) every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the plant, its seeds, or extracts.
N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate (7482). Other name: DMZ.
N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (7402). Other
names: N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4
(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine; and N-hydroxy MDA.
N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate (7484). Other name: LBJ.
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


Psilocybin (7437).
Psilocyn (7438).
Tetrahydrocannabinols (7370), including synthetic equivalents of
the substances contained in the plant, or in the resinous
extractives of Cannabis, sp. and synthetic substances, derivatives,
and their isomers with similar chemical structure and
pharmacological activity such as:
(A) ð1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers;
(B) ð6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers; and
(C) ð3, cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical

isomers.
Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally
standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of
numerical designation of atomic positions are covered. Other
name: THC.
Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine (7455). Some trade or other
names: N-Ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine; (1-phenylcyclohexyl)
ethylamine; N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine; cyclohexamine;
PCE.
Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine (7458). Some trade or other
names: 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine; PCP; PHP.
y
Thiophene analog of phencyclidine (7470). Some trade or other
names: 1-(1-(2-thienyl) cyclohexyl) piperidine; 2-Thienyl Analog
of Phencyclidine; TPCP.
Salvia divinorum or salvinorin A, including:
(A) all parts of the plant that are classified botanically as salvia
divinorum, whether growing or not;
(B) the seeds of the plant;
(C) any extract from any part of the plant; and
(D) every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the plant, its seeds, or extracts.
5-Methoxy-N,N-Dimethyltryptamine. Some trade or other names:
5-methoxy-3-[2- (dimethylamino)ethyl]indole; 5-MeO-DMT.
2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-E).
2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-D).
2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine (2C-C).
2-(4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine (2C-I).
2-[4-(Ethylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl] ethanamine (2C-T-2).
2-[4-(Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl] ethanamine (2C-T-4).
2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine (2C-H).
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl) ethanamine (2C-N).
2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl) ethanamine (2C-P).
Deschloroketamine (2-Phenyl-2-
(methylamino)cyclohexanone).
4-Hydroxy-MET (4-Hydroxy-N-methyl-N-
ethyltryptamine).
N-methyltryptamine (1H-Indole-3-ethanamine, N-methyl-).
1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)butan-1-one (other
names: eutylone; bk-EBDB (7549)).
N-(1-amino- 3,3-dimethyl-1- oxobutan-2-yl)-
1-butyl-1H-indazole-3- carboxamide (other name:
ADB–BUTINACA) (7027).
4-methyl-1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one (other names:
á-PiHP; alpha-PiHP) (7551).
2-(methylamino)-1-(3-methylphenyl)propan-1-one (other names:
3–MMC; 3-methylmethcathinone) (1259).
(e) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted in a rule adopted by
the board or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound,
mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following
substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system,
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence
of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the
specific chemical designation:
Etizolam (4-(2- chlorophenyl)-2- ethyl-9- methyl- 6H-
thieno[3,2-f] [1,2,4] triazolo[4,3-a] [1,4diazepine) (other names
include: Etilaam, Etizest, Depas, Etizola, Sedekopan, and
Pasaden).
Flubromazolam (8-bromo-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-
4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine).
Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (other names include GHB;
gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid; sodium
oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate) (2010).
Mecloqualone (2572).
Methaqualone (2565).
(f) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that
contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant
effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers:
([+/-]) cis-4-methylaminorex (([+/-])cis-4,5-
dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine) (1590).
Amineptine (7-[(10,11-dihydro-5H- dibenzo[a,d]cyclohepten- 5-
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


yl)amino] heptanoic acid) (1219).
Aminorex (1585). Other names: aminoxaphen;
2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; or
4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine.
4,4'-Dimethylaminorex (4,4'-DMAR; 4,5-dihydro- 4-methyl-5-(4-
methylphenyl)- 2- oxazolamine; 4-methyl-5- (4-methylphenyl)-
4,5-dihydro-1,3-oxazol- 2-amine).
Benzylone, 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(benzylamino)propan
-1-one. Synonyms: BMDP, N-benzyl methylone,
3,4-Methylenedioxy-Nbenzylcathinone,
N-benzyl-3,4-methylenedioxycathinone.
Cathinone (1235). Some trade or other names:
2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone; alpha-aminopropiophenone;
2-aminopropiophenone; and norephedrone.
Ethylphenidate (ethyl 2-phenyl-2-(piperidin-2-yl)acetate) (1727).
Fenethylline (1503).
N-Benzylpiperazine (7493). Other names: BZP; and
1-benzylpiperazine.
N-ethylamphetamine (1475).
M e s o c a r b ( N - p h e n y l - N - ( 3 - ( 1 -
phenylpropan-2-yl)-1,2,3-oxadiazol-3- ium-5yl)carbamimidate)
(1227).
Methcathinone (1237). Some other trade names:
2-Methylamino-1-Phenylpropan-I-one; Ephedrone;
Monomethylpropion; UR 1431.
N, N-dimethylamphetamine (1480). Other names: N,
N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; and N,
N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine.
Methiopropamine (N-methyl-1- (thiophen-2-yl) propan-2- amine)
(1478).
(g) Synthetic drugs as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321.
SECTION 3. IC 35-48-2-6, AS AMENDED BY THE TECHNICAL
CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS
AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Sec. 6. (a) The controlled substances listed in this section are included
in schedule II.
(b) Any of the following substances, except those narcotic drugs
listed in other schedules, whether produced directly or indirectly by
extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by
means of chemical synthesis, or by combination of extraction and
chemical synthesis:
(1) Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


preparation of opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine,
dextrorphan, nalbuphine, naloxone, naltrexone, and their
respective salts but including:
(A) raw opium (9600);
(B) opium extracts (9610);
(C) opium fluid extracts (9620);
(D) powdered opium (9639);
(E) granulated opium (9640);
(F) tincture of opium (9630);
(G) codeine (9050);
(H) dihydroetorphine (9334);
(I) ethylmorphine (9190);
(J) etorphine hydrochloride (9059);
(K) hydrocodone (9193), and any hydrocodone combination
product, as determined by the federal Food and Drug
Administration;
(L) hydromorphone (9150);
(M) metopon (9260);
(N) morphine (9300);
(O) oxycodone (9143);
(P) oxymorphone (9652);
(Q) thebaine (9333); and
(R) oripavine.
(2) Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof
which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the
substances referred to in subdivision (b)(1) of this section,
subdivision (1), but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids of
opium.
(3) Opium poppy and poppy straw.
(4) Coca leaves (9040) and any salt, compound, derivative, or
preparation of coca leaves (including cocaine (9041) and
ecgonine (8180) and their salts, isomers, derivatives, and salts of
isomers and derivatives), and any salt, compound, derivative, or
preparation thereof that is chemically equivalent or identical with
these substances except that the substances do not include:
(A) decocainized coca leaves or an extraction of coca leaves
that does not contain cocaine or ecgonine;
(B) [123I]ioflupane; or
(C) [18F]FP-CIT.
(5) Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of poppy straw
in either liquid, solid, or powder form which contains the
phenanthrene alkaloids of the opium poppy) (9670).
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


(c) Opiates. Any of the following opiates, including their isomers,
esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers whenever
the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible
within the specific chemical designation:
Alfentanil (9737).
Alphaprodine (9010).
Anileridine (9020).
Bezitramide (9800).
Bulk dextropropoxyphene (nondosage forms) (9273).
Carfentanil (9743).
Dihydrocodeine (9120).
Diphenoxylate (9170).
Fentanyl (9801).
Isomethadone (9226).
Levo-alphacetylmethadol (9648). Other names:
Levo-alpha-acetylmethadol; levomethadyl acetate; and LAAM.
Levomethorphan (9210).
Levorphanol (9220).
Metazocine (9240).
Methadone (9250).
Methadone-Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethyl-amino-4,
4-diphenyl butane (9254).
Moramide-Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1,
1-diphenylpropane- carboxylic acid (9802).
Oliceridine (N-[(3-methoxythiophen- 2-yl) methyl]({2- [(9R)-9-
(pyridin- 2-yl)-6-oxaspiro[4.5]decan-9-yl]ethyl})amine) (9245).
Pethidine (Meperidine) (9230).
Pethidine-Intermediate- A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine
(9232).
Pethidine-Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate
(9233).
Pethidine-Intermediate-C,1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carbo
xylic acid (9234).
Phenazocine (9715).
Piminodine (9730).
Racemethorphan (9732).
Racemorphan (9733).
Remifentanil (9739).
Sufentanil (9740).
Tapentadol.
Thiafentanil.
(d) Stimulants. Any material compound, mixture, or preparation
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


which contains any quantity of the following substances having a
potential for abuse associated with a stimulant effect on the central
nervous system:
(1) Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical
isomers (1100).
(2) Methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of its
isomers (1105).
(3) Phenmetrazine and its salts (1631).
(4) Methylphenidate (1724).
(5) Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, its isomers, and salts of its
isomers.
(e) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted by rule of the board
or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture,
or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances
having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation:
Amobarbital (2125).
Glutethimide (2550).
Pentobarbital (2270).
Phencyclidine (7471).
Secobarbital (2315).
(f) Immediate precursors. Unless specifically excepted by rule of the
board or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound,
mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following
substances:
(1) Immediate precursor to amphetamine and methamphetamine:
Phenylacetone (8501). Some trade or other names:
phenyl-2-propanone; P2P; benzyl methyl ketone; methyl benzyl
ketone.
(2) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine (PCP):
(A) 1-phenylcyclohexylamine (7460); or
(B) 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC) (8603).
(3) Immediate precursor to fentanyl:
(A) 4-anilino-N-phenethylpiperidine (ANPP) (8333); or
(B) N-phenyl-N-(piperidin-4-yl)propionamide (norfentanyl)
(8366).
(g) Hallucinogenic substances:
Dronabinol oral solution. Other name:
(-)-delta-9-trans-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-9-THC).
Nabilone (7379). Other name: (+/-)-trans-3-
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-6, 6a, 7, 8, 10, 10a-hexahydro-1-hydroxy -6,
6-dimethyl-9H-dibenzo [b,d] pyran-9-one.
SECTION 4. IC 35-48-2-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2015,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The controlled substances listed in this
section are included in schedule III.
(b) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
which contains any quantity of the following substances having a
stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts,
isomers (whether optical, position, or geometric), and salts of such
isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in dosage unit
form containing any stimulant substances listed in schedule II
which compounds, mixtures, or preparations were listed on April
1, 1986, as excepted compounds under 21 CFR 1308.32, and any
other drug of the quantitative composition shown in that list for
those drugs or that is the same except that it contains a lesser
quantity of controlled substances (1405).
(2) Benzphetamine (1228).
(3) Chlorphentermine (1645).
(4) Clortermine (1647).
(5) Phendimetrazine (1615).
(c) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
which contains any quantity of the following substances having a
depressant effect on the central nervous system:
(1) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing:
(A) amobarbital (2126);
(B) secobarbital (2316);
(C) pentobarbital (2271); or
(D) any of their salts;
and one (1) or more other active medicinal ingredients which are
not listed in any schedule.
(2) Any suppository dosage form containing:
(A) amobarbital (2126);
(B) secobarbital (2316);
(C) pentobarbital (2271); or
(D) any of their salts;
and approved by the Food and Drug Administration for marketing
only as a suppository.
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


(3) Any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of
barbituric acid, or any salt thereof (2100).
(4) Chlorhexadol (2510).
(5) Embutramide (2020).
(6) Lysergic acid (7300).
(7) Lysergic acid amide (7310).
(8) Methyprylon (2575).
(9) Sulfondiethylmethane (2600).
(10) Sulfonethylmethane (2605).
(11) Sulfonmethane (2610).
(12) A combination product containing Tiletamine and
Zolazepam or any salt thereof (Telazol) (7295).
(13) Any drug product containing gamma-hydroxybutyric acid,
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, for which an
application is approved under section 505 of the federal Food,
Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 301 et seq. (2012).
(d) Nalorphine (a narcotic drug) (9400).
(e) Narcotic Drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
containing any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated
as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in the following limited
quantities:
(1) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine, per 100 milliliters or not
more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater
quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium (9803).
(2) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine, per 100 milliliters or not
more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more
active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts
(9804).
(3) Not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine, per 100 milliliters
or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or
more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic
amounts (9807).
(4) Not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine, per 100
milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with
one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
therapeutic amounts (9808).
(5) Not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or
per 100 grams or not more than 25 milligrams per dosage unit,
with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
therapeutic amounts (9809).
(6) Not more than 50 milligrams of morphine, per 100 milliliters
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


or per 100 grams with one (1) or more active nonnarcotic
ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts (9810).
(7) Buprenorphine (9064).
(f) Anabolic steroid (as defined in 21 U.S.C. 802(41)(A) and 21
U.S.C. 802(41)(B)).
(g) The board shall except by rule any compound, mixture, or
preparation containing any stimulant or depressant substance listed in
subsections (b) through (e) from the application of any part of this
article if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one (1) or
more active medicinal ingredients not having a stimulant or depressant
effect on the central nervous system, and if the admixtures are included
therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that
vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a stimulant
or depressant effect on the central nervous system.
(h) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of Ketamine (7285).
(i) Hallucinogenic substances:
Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft
gelatin capsule in a United States Food and Drug Administration
approved drug product (7369).
Marijuana (7360).
Tetrahydrocannabinols (7370), including synthetic
equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the
resinous extractives of Cannabis, sp. and synthetic substances,
derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure
and pharmacological activity such as:
(A) ð1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers;
(B) ð6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers; and
(C) ð3, cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical

isomers.
Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally
standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of
numerical designation of atomic positions are covered. Other
name: THC.
Dronabinol oral solution. Other name:
(-)-delta-9-trans-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-9-THC).
SECTION 5. IC 35-48-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.61-2020,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A person who:
(1) knowingly or intentionally:
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


(A) manufactures;
(B) finances the manufacture of;
(C) delivers; or
(D) finances the delivery of;
a controlled substance or controlled substance analog, pure or
adulterated, classified in schedule I, except marijuana, hash oil,
hashish, or salvia or a controlled substance, or controlled
substance analog, pure or adulterated, classified in schedule II or
III, except marijuana, hash oil, or hashish; or
(2) possesses, with intent to:
(A) manufacture;
(B) finance the manufacture of;
(C) deliver; or
(D) finance the delivery of;
a controlled substance or controlled substance analog, pure or
adulterated, classified in schedule I, except marijuana, hash oil,
hashish, or salvia or a controlled substance, or controlled
substance analog, pure or adulterated, classified in schedule II or
III, except marijuana, hash oil, or hashish;
commits dealing in a schedule I, II, or III controlled substance, a Level
6 felony, except as provided in subsections (b) through (f).
(b) A person may be convicted of an offense under subsection (a)(2)
only if:
(1) there is evidence in addition to the weight of the drug that the
person intended to manufacture, finance the manufacture of,
deliver, or finance the delivery of the drug; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is at least twenty-eight (28)
grams.
(c) The offense is a Level 5 felony if:
(1) the amount of the drug involved is at least one (1) gram but
less than five (5) grams; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is less than one (1) gram and
an enhancing circumstance applies.
(d) The offense is a Level 4 felony if:
(1) the amount of the drug involved is at least five (5) grams but
less than ten (10) grams; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is at least one (1) gram but
less than five (5) grams and an enhancing circumstance applies.
(e) The offense is a Level 3 felony if:
(1) the amount of the drug involved is at least ten (10) grams but
less than twenty-eight (28) grams; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is at least five (5) grams but
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151


less than ten (10) grams and an enhancing circumstance applies.
(f) The offense is a Level 2 felony if:
(1) the amount of the drug involved is at least twenty-eight (28)
grams; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is at least ten (10) grams but
less than twenty-eight (28) grams and an enhancing circumstance
applies.
SECTION 6. IC 35-48-4-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.61-2020,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) A person who, without a valid prescription
or order of a practitioner acting in the course of the practitioner's
professional practice, knowingly or intentionally possesses a:
(1) controlled substance or controlled substance analog (pure or
adulterated), classified in schedule I, except marijuana, hashish,
or salvia; or
(2) controlled substance or controlled substance analog (pure or
adulterated), classified in schedule II, III, or IV, except
marijuana or hashish;
commits possession of a controlled substance, a Class A misdemeanor,
except as provided in subsection (b).
(b) The offense is a Level 6 felony if the person commits the offense
and an enhancing circumstance applies.
(c) A person who, without a valid prescription or order of a
practitioner acting in the course of the practitioner's professional
practice, knowingly or intentionally obtains:
(1) more than four (4) ounces of schedule V controlled substances
containing codeine in any given forty-eight (48) hour period
unless pursuant to a prescription;
(2) a schedule V controlled substance pursuant to written or
verbal misrepresentation; or
(3) possession of a schedule V controlled substance other than by
means of a prescription or by means of signing an exempt
narcotic register maintained by a pharmacy licensed by the
Indiana state board of pharmacy;
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
2026 IN 1298—LS 6709/DI 151